District of Columbia statutes.
1-617.15

Collective bargaining agreements.

(a)

An agreement with a labor organization is subject to the approval of the Mayor or his or her designee; provided, that an agreement with a labor organization of employees of the Office of the Attorney General is subject to the approval of the Attorney General, and an agreement with a labor organization of employees of the District of Columbia Board of Education or the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia is subject to the approval of the respective Boards. An agreement shall be approved within 45 days from the date of its execution by the parties, if it conforms to applicable law. If disapproved because certain provisions are asserted to be contrary to law, the agreement shall either be returned to the parties for renegotiation of the offensive provisions or such provisions shall be deleted from the agreement. An agreement which has not been approved or disapproved within the prescribed period of 45 days shall go into effect on the 46th day and shall be binding on the parties.

(b)

The Mayor and each appropriate personnel authority shall submit the collective bargaining agreement to the Council for its information.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1715, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(v), 33 DCR 7241
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(u), 43 DCR 2978
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1033(f), 62 DCR 10905

History

1981 Ed., § 1-618.15.
1973 Ed., § 1-347.15.

Prior Codifications

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “provided, that an agreement with a labor organization of employees of the Office of the Attorney General is subject to the approval of the Attorney General, and an agreement with a labor organization of employees of the District of Columbia Board of Education or The Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia is subject to the approval of the respective Boards” for “or in the case of employees of the District of Columbia Board of Education or the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia, by the respective Boards” in (a).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1033(f) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation

Repeal of § 3 of Law 6-177: Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 provided that the provisions of § 3 are repealed on the 1st day following the 36-month period after February 24, 1987.

Repeal of § 4(b) of Law 6-177: Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 8-74, effective March 15, 1990, provided that § 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 is repealed.

Editor's Notes